South Dakota, session 2026, SB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 31-34-2 be AMENDED:
31-34-2. Before August 1, 2021, the Department of Revenue shall distribute the
sum of three million dollars on a pro rata basis to each county for the purpose of planning
and completing an inventory of small structures as prescribed by the Department of
Transportation. For any moneys appropriated for county rural access infrastructure, the
Department of Revenue shall deposit a portion of the sum into a rural access infrastructure
fund for each county based on the allocation calculated in accordance with this section for
the purposes described in § 31-34-3. Each county's allocated percentage is calculated by
using the total number of small structures on township roads and county secondary roads
located in a county divided by the sum of all small structures on township roads and county
secondary roads in the state as reported to the Department of Transportation, multiplied
by one hundred. Each county that receives moneys from this rural access infrastructure
program shall use the moneys in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
Section 2. There is appropriated $5,000,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Revenue, to deposit into rural access infrastructure funds, to be distributed and used in the
manner described in § 31-34-2.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Revenue shall approve vouchers and the state
auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by June
30, 2031, shall revert in accordance with the procedures described in chapter 4-8.

26.925.15 2 240
Section 5. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
SB240 ENROLLED

26.925.15 3 240
An Act to make an appropriation for county rural access infrastructure and to declare an
emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 240
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 240 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB240 ENROLLED